North Carolina, session 2025, HB649.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The North Carolina Collaboratory at the University of North
Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory) shall study the potential effects of the changes outlined
in this act on the county tier designation system under G.S. 143B-437.08.
SECTION 1.(b) The study shall focus on the following proposed changes to the
county tier designation system under G.S. 143B-437.08:
(1) Changing the criteria used to rank counties.
(2) Changing the way in which tier designations are assigned.
(3) Changing the time frame in which counties are ranked.
SECTION 1.(c) The study shall evaluate the impact of the proposed changes listed
in subsection (b) of this section on the following:
(1) The rankings of all 100 counties.
(2) Programs that use the tier designation system for their administration.
(3) The ease of doing business in the State.
SECTION 1.(d) The Collaboratory shall consult with the following agencies to
conduct the study required by this act:
(1) The Department of Commerce.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) The Department of Public Instruction.
SECTION 1.(e) The study shall evaluate whether the proposed changes listed in
subsection (b) of this section:
(1) Align with the State's economic development goals.
(2) Use current, reliable, timely, and high-quality data.
(3) Implement a methodology that is easy to understand.
(4) Accurately identify areas of distress.
SECTION 2. No later than December 31, 2025, the Collaboratory shall submit a
preliminary report of the results of the study required by this act to the Joint Legislative Economic
Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee (EDGE) and the Fiscal Research
Division (FRD). No later than December 1, 2026, the Collaboratory shall submit a final report of
the results of the study required by this act to EDGE and FRD.
*H649-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 649-First Edition